Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB502.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 27 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a chapter to read:CHAPTER 8RELIABLE ENERGY SITING AND ELECTRIC TRANSITION BOARDSec.801. Findings and declaration of policy.802. Definitions.803. Reliable Energy Siting and Electric Transition Board.804. Powers and duties of board.805. Certificate of reliable energy supply.806. Application process.12345678910111213141516 807. Application review.808. Pennsylvania Siting Advisory Council.809. Effect of other laws.§ 801. Findings and declaration of policy.The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) The present and predicted growth in energy demands in this Commonwealth requires a Statewide procedure for the selection and use of sites for reliable energy generating and storage facilities. The selection of sites will have an impact on our citizens, the location and growth of industry and the use of natural resources of this Commonwealth.(2) It is the policy of the Commonwealth to locate large reliable energy generating and storage facilities in an orderly manner that is compatible with human health, safety, environmental preservation and the efficient use of resources.(3) In order to effectuate this policy, there is need for greater Statewide coordination of facility siting to ensure continued electric power system reliability and integrity while satisfying the Commonwealth's obligations under section 27 of Article I of the Constitution of Pennsylvania and limiting adverse effects on human health, safety and the environment.§ 802. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Advisory council." The Pennsylvania Siting Advisory Council established in section 808(a) (relating to Pennsylvania Siting Advisory Council).20250HB0502PN1479 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 "Board." The Reliable Energy Siting and Electric Transition Board established in section 803 (relating to Reliable Energy Siting and Electric Transition Board)."Department." The Department of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth."Electric generator." The equipment or machinery capable of producing, generating or storing electricity for private or public consumption."Property" or "site." The parcel of real property upon which a reliable energy generating or storage facility or storage facility is proposed to be constructed or modified."Reliable energy generating facility" or "facility." An electric generator plant, or a combination of electric generators and associated facilities, with a nameplate capacity equal to or greater than 25 megawatts."Reliable energy generator." A person that proposes to construct:(1) An electric generator with a nameplate capacity equal to or greater than 25 megawatts or modify an existing electric generator to result in a nameplate capacity equal to or greater than 25 megawatts.(2) A reliable energy storage facility."Reliable energy storage facility." A facility located in this Commonwealth employing technology, including any electrochemical, thermal or electromechanical technology, or any technology defined as "energy storage technology" in 26 U.S.C. § 48E (relating to clean energy investment credit) or 26 CFR 1.48E-2(g)(6) (relating to qualified investments in qualified facilities and EST for purposes of section 48E) as of the effective date of this section, that is capable of absorbing and 20250HB0502PN1479 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 storing energy for use at a later time and that has a maximum facility output of at least 10 megawatts and the technical capacity to deliver its maximum facility output in a minimum duration of no less than four hours."Secretary." The Secretary of Environmental Protection of the Commonwealth.§ 803. Reliable Energy Siting and Electric Transition Board.(a) Establishment.--The Reliable Energy Siting and Electric Transition Board is established within the department for the purpose of facilitating the development of new sources of reliable energy in this Commonwealth while limiting adverse effects on human health, safety and the environment.(b) Membership.--The board shall consist of members selected as follows:(1) The secretary or a designee who shall be an employee of the department.(2) The Secretary of Community and Economic Development or a designee who shall be an employee of the Department of Community and Economic Development.(3) The Secretary of Labor and Industry or a designee who shall be an employee of the Department of Labor and Industry.(4) The chairperson of the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission or a designee who shall be an employee of the Pennsylvania Public Utility Commission.(5) The President of the Pennsylvania Building and Construction Trades Council or a designee who shall be an officer of the Pennsylvania Building and Construction Trades Council.(6) The President of the Pennsylvania Chamber of 20250HB0502PN1479 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Business and Industry or a designee who shall be an employee of the Pennsylvania Chamber of Business and Industry.(7) The chairperson of the department's Environmental Justice Advisory Board.(c) Organization.--The secretary shall serve as chairperson of the board. The members shall select from among themselves officers as they deem necessary.(d) Quorum and meetings.--(1) A majority of the members of the board shall constitute a quorum.(2) The board shall meet to conduct official business at the call of the chairperson.(e) Expenses.--Members shall receive no compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for any expenses necessarily incurred by them in the performance of their duties.(f) Administrative services.--The department shall provide administrative services and staff, including legal counsel and legal staff, to the board.§ 804. Powers and duties of board.The board shall have and may exercise all powers necessary or appropriate to carry out and effectuate the board's purposes under this chapter, including, but not limited to:(1) Appoint an executive director.(2) Make and execute contracts and other instruments.(3) Approve, conditionally approve or deny applications under section 807 (relating to application review).(4) Consult with the advisory council.(5) Promulgate regulations necessary to carry out the purposes of this chapter.(6) Perform other operational activities necessary or 20250HB0502PN1479 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 appropriate to further the purposes of this chapter.§ 805. Certificate of reliable energy supply.(a) Applicability.--Prior to the preparation of a site or construction of a reliable energy generating facility or storage facility in this Commonwealth, a person may obtain a certificate of reliable energy supply under this chapter.(b) Purpose.--To ensure the efficient and uniform entry of new reliable energy generating or storage facilities that protect human health, safety and the environment in this Commonwealth, the board is authorized to issue certificates of reliable energy supply that enable the prompt construction of needed energy resources.(c) Restrictions.--A certificate of reliable energy supply may not be issued to a person if:(1) the proposed reliable energy generating facility or storage facility will be located on property that is zoned for residential uses and has been zoned for residential uses since January 1, 2024; or(2) the person has previously sought approval from a county or municipal or other local government or authority for the proposed reliable energy generating facility or storage facility or a substantially similar reliable energy generating facility or storage facility at the same location and been denied in an appealable action.(d) Effect of certificate.--(1) A county or municipal or other local government or authority by ordinance, regulation or other action may not require any land use approval, consent, permit, certificate or condition that materially impedes the purposes of this chapter or will delay or prevent the construction, operation 20250HB0502PN1479 - 6 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 or maintenance of a reliable energy generating facility or storage facility that has been issued a certificate of reliable energy supply.(2) The requirements of sections 619.2 and 1105 of the act of July 31, 1968 (P.L.805, No.247), known as the Pennsylvania Municipalities Planning Code, shall be deemed satisfied by the board's issuance of a certificate of reliable energy supply under this chapter.(e) Transfer.--A certificate of reliable energy supply may be transferred, subject to the approval of the board, to a person who agrees to comply with the terms, conditions and modifications contained in the certificate of reliable energy supply and other requirements as determined by the board.§ 806. Application process.(a) Application.--An applicant for a certificate of reliable energy supply shall file with the board an application, in a form that the board may prescribe, including the following information:(1) A description of the proposed reliable energy generating facility or storage facility.(2) A statement and explanation of the need for the proposed reliable energy generating facility or storage facility, including an analysis of the proposed facility's projected benefit to the electric grid within this Commonwealth.(3) Safety and reliability information, including planned provisions for emergency operations and shutdowns, and information on risks related to current and projected extreme weather conditions over the anticipated lifetime of the facility.20250HB0502PN1479 - 7 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (4) Available site information, including maps, description and applicable zoning designation, if any.(5) Justification for adoption of the site selected, including an explanation of why the proposed location is best suited for the reliable energy generating facility or storage facility, how the selection of the proposed site aligns with the applicable county development plan and the potential benefit to the community in which it is located.(6) For sites located in whole or in part within an area identified using the Pennsylvania Wildlife Action Plan's Conservation Opportunity Area Tool as "Pennsylvania Climate Change Connectivity," an explanation of the specific measures to be taken to minimize and ameliorate impacts on wildlife habitat connectivity. The board may identify a successor tool or successor identification under this paragraph if the Conservation Opportunity Area Tool is no longer available.(7) Studies that have been made by or for the applicant of the environmental impact of the reliable energy generating facility or storage facility.(8) Identification of all environmental permits required for the construction and operation of the reliable energy generating facility or storage facility and the status of the application for the identified permits.(9) A statement certifying that the proposed reliable energy generating facility or storage facility will be designed and constructed in compliance with all applicable Federal and State environmental laws and regulations.(10) A summary of the consultation with municipalities as required under subsection (b).(11) Proof that a copy of the application has been sent 20250HB0502PN1479 - 8 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 to each municipality in which any portion of the proposed reliable energy generating facility or storage facility is to be located. The copy of the application sent to each municipality shall be accompanied by a notice specifying the date on or about which the application is expected to be filed.(12) Any other information required by the board to make a determination under section 807 (relating to application review).(b) Public participation.--(1) Prior to filing an application for a certificate of reliable energy supply, an applicant shall consult with the municipality or municipalities in which the reliable energy generating facility or storage facility is proposed to be located.(2) Consultation with a municipality or municipalities shall include, but not be limited to, good-faith efforts to meet with each chief elected official of the municipality or municipalities or the official's designee to discuss the proposed reliable energy generating facility or storage facility, including why the site was selected, alternative locations that were considered, environmental impacts and potential benefits to the community.(3) At the time of the consultation, the applicant shall provide the municipality with a copy of any technical reports concerning the need for the reliable energy generating facility or storage facility, including a map indicating the area of need, the location of existing surrounding facilities, a detailed description of the proposed site under consideration, a description of the site selection process 20250HB0502PN1479 - 9 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 undertaken by the prospective applicant and the potential environmental effects of the proposed reliable energy generating facility or storage facility.(4) As part of the application for a certificate of reliable energy supply, the applicant shall provide a summary of any meeting held with municipalities under this subsection. In the event the applicant is unable to secure a meeting with a municipality, the application shall contain a detailed explanation of the applicant's best efforts and reasonable attempts to secure the meeting, including, but not limited to, written communications between the applicant and the municipality.(c) Public hearing.--Within 45 days of the filing of a complete application for a certificate of reliable energy supply, the board shall hold at least one public hearing regarding the application and accept public comment. The board may conduct the hearing or appoint an individual to serve as a hearing officer. The following shall apply:(1) The applicant for a certificate of reliable energy supply shall attend the public hearing.(2) The public hearing shall be held in accordance with 65 Pa.C.S. Ch. 7 (relating to open meetings). Notice of the meeting shall be posted on the board's publicly accessible Internet website at least two weeks prior to the meeting.(3) The board may hold the public hearing in a municipality in which the proposed reliable energy generating facility or storage facility is to be located.(4) The board may hold a concurrent public comment period.(5) The board shall review and consider the information 20250HB0502PN1479 - 10 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 received during the public hearing and any applicable public comment period in making a determination under section 807.(d) Fees.--(1) For a reliable energy generating facility or storage facility, the fee required for review of an application for a certificate of reliable energy supply shall be the product of 50¢ times the maximum kilowatt electric capacity, as determined by the estimated net demonstrated capability of the highest capacity alternative.(2) For applications for a reliable energy generating facility or storage facility falling in whole or in part within an area described in subsection (a)(6), the application fee shall be the amount in paragraph (1) plus an additional amount of 5¢ times the maximum kilowatt electricity capacity, as determined by the estimated net demonstrated capability of the highest capacity alternative, and the additional amount shall be deposited as follows:(i) Fifty percent shall be deposited into a restricted account in the State Treasury. The money in the restricted account is appropriated, on approval of the Governor, to the Fish and Boat Commission for the purpose of the State Wildlife Grant Program established under Federal law.(ii) Fifty percent shall be deposited into a restricted account in the State Treasury. The money in the restricted account is appropriated, on approval of the Governor, to the Game Commission for the purpose of the State Wildlife Grant Program established under Federal law.(3) The board may increase the application fee by an 20250HB0502PN1479 - 11 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 amount not to exceed 20% per year in accordance with the act of June 25, 1982 (P.L.633, No.181), known as the Regulatory Review Act.(4) The maximum application filing fee shall be $150,000 or, in the case of a facility falling in whole or in part within an area described in subsection (a)(6), $175,000.(e) Modifications.--(1) If the holder of a certificate of reliable energy supply finds it necessary to propose modifications to the application during the course of project planning or construction, the modifications may be made without revocation of the certificate or reapplication to the board, provided that:(i) the proposed modifications are submitted by the holder to the board; and(ii) the board determines that:(A) the modifications constitute minor or de minimis modifications in the ordinary course of business that do not substantially alter the original application; or(B) the modifications do not constitute minor or de minimis modifications, but the proposal for modification is accompanied by a statement of written assent by the chief elected official of each municipality or municipalities, and the modifications would not adversely alter the determinations of the board with respect to section 807(a)(2) (relating to application review).(2) Notwithstanding paragraph (1), the holder of a certificate of reliable energy may submit an application 20250HB0502PN1479 - 12 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under subsection (a) for a proposed modification.§ 807. Application review.(a) Determination.--The board shall, within 90 days from the date of filing of a complete application, issue to the reliable energy generator a certificate of reliable energy supply for the reliable energy generating facility or storage facility proposed in the application if the board determines that the applicant has demonstrated that:(1) The application is complete and accurate.(2) The proposed reliable energy generating facility or storage facility will:(i) Comply with all applicable Federal and State laws and regulations.(ii) Obtain all necessary environmental permitting for the construction and operation of the proposed reliable energy facility.(iii) Not unduly interfere with the orderly development of the region with consideration having been given to the views of the municipality or municipalities in which the proposed reliable energy generating facility or storage facility will be located.(iv) The proposed reliable energy generating facility or storage facility is necessary or proper for the service, accommodation, convenience or safety of the public.(b) Denial or conditional approval.--If the board determines that the standards under subsection (a) have not been met, the board shall, within 90 days of the date of filing, either deny, in whole or in part, the application, providing in writing its reasons for the denial, or approve the application subject to 20250HB0502PN1479 - 13 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 stated conditions.(c) Amended application.--In the event of denial or conditional approval, the applicant may, within 180 days, submit an amended application. The board shall make a decision on the amended application within 90 days of receipt of the complete amended application.(d) Appeal.--A board's decision under subsection (b) or (c) shall be considered an appealable action under the act of July 13, 1988 (P.L.530, No.94), known as the Environmental Hearing Board Act. The following shall apply:(1) Any appeal of a board decision to the Environmental Hearing Board shall be limited to the administrative record developed before the board.(2) The party challenging the board's decision shall have the burden of proving the board's decision was arbitrary and capricious.(3) The Environmental Hearing Board shall issue its final decision on an appeal of the board's decision within 180 days after the appeal is filed.(4) Procedural errors in the development of the administrative record before the board shall not be a basis for challenging the board's decision unless the errors were so serious and related to matters of such central relevance to the decision that the decision would have been significantly changed had the errors not been made. The person asserting the significance of the procedural errors shall have the burden of proving that the action would have been significantly changed.(5) If the Environmental Hearing Board determines that a board's decision is arbitrary and capricious on the basis of 20250HB0502PN1479 - 14 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 the administrative record, or determines that a procedural error occurred in the development of the administrative record, which error would have significantly changed the board decision, the Environmental Hearing Board shall remand the board's decision to the board to reopen the administrative record and consider the additional information before making a decision on remand.§ 808. Pennsylvania Siting Advisory Council.(a) Establishment.--The Pennsylvania Siting Advisory Council is established within the department. The advisory council shall consist of the following members:(1) The Consumer Advocate of the Commonwealth or a designee who shall be an employee of the Office of Consumer Advocate.(2) The Executive Director of the County Commissioners Association of Pennsylvania or a designee who shall be an employee of the County Commissioners Association of Pennsylvania.(3) The Executive Director of the Pennsylvania Municipal League or a designee who shall be an employee of the Pennsylvania Municipal League.(4) The Executive Director of the Pennsylvania State Association of Township Supervisors or a designee who shall be an employee of the Pennsylvania State Association of Township Supervisors.(5) The Executive Director of the Pennsylvania State Association of Boroughs or a designee who shall be an employee of the Pennsylvania State Association of Boroughs.(6) The Executive Director of the Pennsylvania Farm Bureau or a designee who shall be an employee of the 20250HB0502PN1479 - 15 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 Pennsylvania Farm Bureau.(7) The Executive Director of the Pennsylvania Game Commission or a designee who shall be an employee of the Pennsylvania Game Commission.(8) Other members with diverse expertise in energy, land use planning and environmental protection as the Governor may from time to time appoint.(b) Duties.--The advisory council shall:(1) Make policy recommendations to the board regarding the siting of reliable energy projects and the effect of siting decisions on regional land use and comprehensive planning.(2) Advise and assist the board regarding the public participation provisions under section 806(b) (relating to application process).(3) Provide recommendations to the board on other subjects as the board may direct.§ 809. Effect of other laws.This chapter does not affect, limit or impair any right or authority of the department under:(1) Section 1917-A of the act of April 9, 1929 (P.L.177, No.175), known as The Administrative Code of 1929.(2) The act of June 22, 1937 (P.L.1987, No.394), known as The Clean Streams Law.(3) The act of January 8, 1960 (1959 P.L.2119, No.787), known as the Air Pollution Control Act.(4) The act of November 26, 1978 (P.L.1375, No.325), known as the Dam Safety and Encroachments Act.(5) The act of July 7, 1980 (P.L.380, No.97), known as the Solid Waste Management Act.20250HB0502PN1479 - 16 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) The act of October 18, 1988 (P.L.756, No.108), known as the Hazardous Sites Cleanup Act.(7) 58 Pa.C.S. (relating to oil and gas).Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB0502PN1479 - 17 - 1234